District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.26

Involuntary dissolution on application of creditors.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1320, ch. 854, § 794
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, § 1
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-221.26.
1981 Ed., § 29-426.
1973 Ed., § 29-726.

Prior Codifications